South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3615.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-268.  Except for the healthcare facility's designated patient advocate, staff and other agents of a healthcare facility operating in this State are prohibited from initiating a discussion with a patient or the patient's family regarding the execution of a do not resuscitate order for the patient. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----